Alaska, session 34, HB331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 03.05.010(d) is repealed and reenacted to read: 05 (d) The division of the department with responsibility for agriculture shall 06 certify which agricultural products may use the "Alaska Grown" logo. Agricultural 07 products grown outside the state may not be certified to use the "Alaska Grown" logo. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 37.05.146(c) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 09 (88) fees collected by the Department of Commerce, Community, and 10 Economic Development under AS 44.33.020(a)(45). 11 * Sec. 3. AS 44.33.020(a) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 12 (45) sell promotional merchandise related to the "Alaska Grown" logo 13 and may charge or collect a fee for the sale of promotional merchandise related to the 14 "Alaska Grown" logo; the commissioner may issue a license and charge a license fee 01 for the sale of promotional merchandise related to the "Alaska Grown" logo; the 02 commissioner shall price merchandise sold by the commissioner under this subsection 03 in a manner that ensures a reasonable monetary return to the state; to the extent 04 practicable, the commissioner shall sell only merchandise produced or manufactured 05 in the United States that, subject to AS 36.30, is procured from either an Alaska bidder 06 or a person that employs prisoners under AS 33.30.191(b). 07 * Sec. 4. AS 37.05.146(c)(78) is repealed. 08 * Sec. 5. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 09 read: 10 APPLICABILITY. AS 44.33.020(a)(45), enacted by sec. 3 of this Act, applies to a 11 contract related to use of the "Alaska Grown" logo entered into, renewed, or amended on or 12 after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.